Utah statutes.
38-1-18.   Attorneys' fees -- Offer of judgment.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 38-11-107 and in Subsection (2), in any action brought to enforce any lien under this chapter the successful party shall be entitled to recover a reasonable attorneys' fee, to be fixed by the court, which shall be taxed as costs in the action.

(2)  A person who files a wrongful lien as provided in Section 38-1-25 is not entitled to recover attorneys' fees under Subsection (1).

(3)  A party against whom any action is brought to enforce a lien under this chapter may make an offer of judgment pursuant to Rule 68 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.  If the offer is not accepted and the judgment finally obtained by the offeree is not more favorable than the offer, the offeree shall pay the costs and attorneys' fees incurred by the offeror after the offer was made.

